Indiana, session 2026, HB1252.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-34.1-10-18 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) A broker company who
refers a client or customer to another broker company shall
disclose to the client or customer if the broker company may be
compensated for referring the client or customer.
(b) A disclosure under subsection (a) must be made:
(1) in writing; and
(2) at the time of the referral.
HEA 1252

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1252